Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1817.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5113. Interfering or impeding a first responder's duties.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person who the person knows or reasonably should know is a first responder engaged in the lawful performance of a legal duty, the person knowingly and willfully violates the warning and approaches or remains within 15 feet of the first responder with the intent to:(1) interfere, impede or otherwise obstruct the first responder's ability to perform the first responder's duty;(2) threaten the first responder with physical harm, 12345678910111213141516171819 including a terroristic threat as described under section 2706 (relating to terroristic threats); or(3) harass the first responder.(b) Grading.--(1) A first offense under this section shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A second or subsequent offense under this section shall constitute a misdemeanor of the second degree.(c) Constitution.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit or punish conduct that is otherwise protected by the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"First responder." Includes:(1) A peace officer as defined under section 501 (relating to definitions).(2) A firefighter.(3) Emergency services personnel as defined under section 5112(b) (relating to obstructing emergency services)."Harass." To willfully engage in a course of conduct within 15 feet of a first responder which intentionally causes emotional distress to the first responder and serves no legitimate purpose.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1817PN2236 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526